District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fair Swipe Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:


(1) "Acquirer bank" means a member of a payment card network that contracts
with a merchant for the settlement of electronic payment transactions. An acquirer bank may
contract directly with merchants or indirectly through a processor to process electronic payment
transactions.
(2) "Authorization" means the process through which a merchant requests
approval for an electronic payment transaction from the issuer.
(3) "Clearance" means the process of transmitting final transaction data from a
merchant to an issuer for posting to the cardholder's account and the calculation of fees and
charges, including interchange fees, that apply to the issuer and the merchant.
(4) "Credit card" means a card, plate, coupon book, or other credit device existing
for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.
(5) "Debit card" means a card or other payment code or device issued or approved
for use through a payment card network to debit an asset account, regardless of the purpose for
which the account is established, whether authorization is based on a signature, a personal
identification number, or other means. The term includes a general use prepaid card, as defined
in 15 U.S.C. § 1693l-1, but does not include paper checks.
(6) "Electronic payment transaction" means a transaction in which a person uses a
debit card, a credit card, or other payment code or device issued or approved through a payment
card network to debit a deposit account or use a line of credit, whether authorization is based on
a signature, a personal identification number, or other means.
(7) "Gratuity" means a voluntary monetary contribution to an employee from a
guest, patron, or customer in connection with services rendered.


(8) "Interchange fee" means a fee established, charged, or received by a payment
card network for the purpose of compensating the issuer for its involvement in an electronic
payment transaction.
(9) "Issuer" means a person issuing a debit card or credit card or the issuer's agent.
(10) "Merchant" means a person that accepts electronic payment transactions and
collects and remits a tax.
(11) "Payment card network" means an entity that:
(A) Directly or through licensed members, processors, or agents, provides
the proprietary services, infrastructure, and software to route information and data for the
purpose of conducting electronic payment transaction authorization, clearance, and settlement;
and
(B) A merchant uses to accept as a form of payment a brand of debit card,
credit card, or other device that may be used to carry out electronic payment transactions.
(12) "Person" means any individual, firm, public or private corporation,
government, partnership, association, or any other organization or entity.
(13) "Processor" means an entity that facilitates, services, processes, or manages
the debit or credit authorization, billing, transfer, payment procedures, or settlement with respect
to any electronic payment transaction.
(14) "Settlement" means the process of transmitting sales information to the
issuing bank for collection and reimbursement of funds to the merchant and calculating and
reporting the net transaction amount to the issuer and merchant for an electronic payment
transaction that is cleared.
(15) "Tax" means sales and use tax imposed pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-
2002.


(16) "Tax and gratuity documentation" means documentation or data sufficient for
the payment card network to determine the total amount of the electronic payment transaction
and the tax or gratuity amount of the transaction. Tax documentation may be related to a single
electronic payment transaction or multiple electronic payment transactions aggregated over a
period of time. Examples of tax documentation include invoices, receipts, journals, ledgers, and
tax returns filed with the Office of Tax and Revenue.
Sec. 3. Prohibition on charging of interchange fees on sales tax part of credit and debit
card transactions.
(a) An issuer, a payment card network, an acquirer bank, or a processor shall not receive
or charge a merchant any interchange fee on the tax amount or gratuity of an electronic payment
transaction if the merchant informs the acquirer bank or its designee of the tax or gratuity amount
100 as part of the authorization or settlement process for the electronic payment transaction. The
101 merchant shall transmit the tax or gratuity amount data as part of the authorization or settlement
102 process to avoid being charged interchange fees on the tax or gratuity amount of an electronic
103 payment transaction.
104 (b) A merchant that does not transmit the tax or gratuity amount data in accordance with
105 this section as part of the authorization or settlement process may submit tax and gratuity
106 documentation for the electronic payment transaction to the acquirer bank or its designee no later
107 than 180 days after the date of the electronic payment transaction, and, within 30 days after the
108 merchant submits the necessary tax and gratuity documentation, the issuer or payment card
109 network shall credit to the merchant the amount of interchange fees charged on the tax or
110 gratuity amount of the electronic payment transaction.
111 (c) This section shall not be construed as imposing liability on a payment card network
112 for the accuracy of the tax or gratuity data reported by the merchant.


113 (d) It shall be unlawful for an issuer, a payment card network, an acquirer bank, or a
114 processor to alter or manipulate the computation and imposition of interchange fees by
115 increasing the rate or amount of the fees applicable to or imposed upon the portion of a credit or
116 debit card transaction not attributable to taxes or gratuities to circumvent the effect of this
117 section.
118 (e) An issuer, a payment card network, an acquirer bank, a processor, or other designated
119 entity that has received the tax or gratuity documentation and violates subsection (a) of this
120 section shall be subject to a civil penalty of $1,000 per electronic payment transaction and shall
121 refund the merchant the interchange fee calculated on the tax or gratuity amount relative to the
122 electronic payment transaction.
123 Sec. 4. Non-severability.
124 If any provision of section 3 of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
125 held to be unconstitutional, beyond the statutory authority of the Council, or otherwise invalid,
126 then all provisions of this act shall be deemed invalid.
127 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
128 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
129 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
130 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
131 Sec. 6. Effective date.
132 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
133 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
134 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
135 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
136 Columbia Register.